Utah statutes.
63C-7-209.   Term of the Utah Communications Agency Network -- Dissolution
-- Withdrawal.
(1) (a)  The Utah Communications Agency Network may be dissolved by a vote of
3/4 of all the members of the board or by an act of the Legislature.
(b)  Title to all assets of the Utah Communications Agency Network upon its
dissolution shall revert to the members and the state pro rata, based upon the
total amount of moneys paid to the Utah Communications Agency Network by each
member or the state for services provided to each by the communications
network.
(c)  The board is authorized to:
(i)  take any necessary action to dissolve the Utah Communications Agency
Network; and
(ii)  dispose of the property of the Utah Communications Agency Network upon
its dissolution as provided in Subsection (1)(b).
(2) (a)  Each member may, at any time, withdraw as a member of the Utah
Communications Agency Network by delivering to the executive committee a
written notice of withdrawal which has been approved by the governing body of
the member, except that a member may not withdraw from the Utah Communications
Agency Network at any time during which it has an outstanding payment
obligation to the Utah Communications Agency Network as a result of having
entered into a service contract, lease, or other financial obligation.
(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(a), the executive committee shall
delete the petitioning member from the membership of the Utah Communications
Agency Network as of the date of the executive committee’s receipt of the
member’s notice of withdrawal.  The executive committee may not include a
member who has given notice of withdrawal in any future obligation of the Utah
Communications Agency Network.
